District of Columbia statutes.
31-5604.04

Revocation of exemptions.

(a)

The Commissioner may, by order, deny or revoke an exemption specified in § 31-5604.01(7), (8), (10) or (12) or in § 31-5604.02 for any security or transaction.

(b)

An order issued under this section shall not be retroactive. A person shall not violate § 31-5603.01, § 31-5603.07, or § 31-5604.05 by reason of an offer to sell or sale effected after the entry of an order under this section if the person did not know and, in the exercise of reasonable care could not have known, of the order.

History

Oct. 26, 2000, D.C. Law 13-203, § 404, 47 DCR 7837